Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5642.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 52507. The department shall not clear-cut more than 5 acres of forest to utilize the site for a purpose other than forestry, or lease forest for such clear-cutting and utilization, except in the case of an emergency or if the department has done all of the following: (a) Notified in writing the county board of commissioners; the county executive, manager, or other chief administrative officer, if any, of the county; the township board of the township; and any property owners that own property immediately adjacent to where the site is located of the following: (i) The location and acreage of the site. (ii) The intended use. (iii) The cost of clear-cutting the property. (b) Not less than 10 business days after complying with subdivision (a), posted notice of the project on the department's website and published notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the project is located. The notice must include the information listed in subdivision (a)(i) to (iii) and solicit public comment on the project. The public comment period must not be less than 5 days after the notice is posted and published as provided in this subdivision. (c) Prepared and posted on the department's website a written summary of comments timely received and the department's responses to those comments.